apertium-uzb.uzb.lexc
LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! <n.pl.нікі.pl> sequence should not be allowed. This form is rare (1 (!)
! match in RFERL corpus for ‘нікілар‘), probably not worh bothering at all.
! It could be handled in a way abessive is handled, but since NIKI in contrast
! to the abessive SIZ can appear after possessves, that would require
! duplicating possessives as well.
!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! try нікілер?  -JNW

!gen.subst part was:
!%<px%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} CASES ;
!%<px%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}iki%>l%{A%}r CASES ;

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}iki%>l%{A%}r CASES ;

%<loc%>:%>%{D%}agi ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}y CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! Probably should be CLITICS-INCL-COP, same for all <sim> -JNW 2015-01-17

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ng CASE-ETC ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{s%}i CASE-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}miz CASE-ETC ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ngiz CASE-ETC ;      
%<px3pl%>:%>lari CASE-ETC ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-VOL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ng # ;
%<p3%>%<sp%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{s%}i # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}miz # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ngiz # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>lari # ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+siz%<post%>:%>siz CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+li%<post%>:%>li CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>lar CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>lar POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>lar ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don‘t think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}an CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}a CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASES ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r CASES ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn‘t appear after possessives

%+siz%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2014-08-16//FMT: this was "GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST"

LEXICON GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<gen%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2015-01-18//JNW: added <nom>, since it needs a case for transfer, and no other cases are ever added, or even presumed by the transducer to be okay.  But worth CHECK ing..
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}agi GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}y CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}ek CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ng GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}i GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}miz GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}nglar GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3pl%>:%>lari GER-CASE-ETC ; 

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{i%}ngiz GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{i%}ngizlar GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>lar GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>lar GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon


LEXICON Copula

e%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:ekan GER-POSSESSIVES ;
e%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:ekan%>%{L%}%{I%}k GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! This is an evidential aorist form, not past -JNW
e%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:ekan V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:emas% ekan V-PERS-S1 ;

e%<cop%>%<ifi%>:e%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

e%<cop%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:emas V-PERS-S1 ;


LEXICON NUM

%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;  
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>inchi  # ;
                   
%<num%>: # ;                                    

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;



LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>: SUBST ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>: SUBST ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>lar N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>dagi # ;



! LEXICON #
!
!# ; 

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ; ! this leads to non-final analyses. was it intentional? (no cop reading, etc) should we change it with POSSESSIVES?

CASE-ETC ; ! this leads to non-final analyses. was it intentional? (no cop reading etc) should we change it with CASES-ETC?

!CASES-ETC ;
!POSSESSIVES ;

ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON POSS-REAL 

%<px1sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ng CASE-ETC ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{s%}i CASE-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}miz CASE-ETC ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ngiz CASE-ETC ;      
%<px3pl%>:%>lari CASE-ETC ; 

LEXICON POSS-REAL-NONOM

%<px1sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}m CASE-NONOM ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ng CASE-NONOM ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{s%}i CASE-NONOM ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}miz CASE-NONOM ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{i%}ngiz CASE-NONOM;      
%<px3pl%>:%>lari CASE-NONOM ; 

LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
!%<nom%>: SUB-COP ;  ! FIXME

LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

CASE-COMMON ;

LEXICON CASE-NONOM

CASE-COMMON ;

LEXICON CASE-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>ning CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}a CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>ni CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>da CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>dan CLITICS-INCL-COP ;



LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

! %<px%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}ki%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>dagi # ;

!LEXICON SUB-COP
!
!%+e%<cop%>:%>dir # ;  

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;
      
LEXICON POWERS
%0%0:%0%0    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yüz"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "bin"

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: # ; ! Dir/LR

!%<num%>%<ord%>:ʻ%{i%}nc%{I%} # ;
!%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ʻ%{I%}nc%{I%} # ;
!%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:ʻ%{I%}nc%{i%} # ;

!%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>%<nom%>:%-%{A%}у # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>:%-%{A%}у # ;

!%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
!%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;
!%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%{a%}%{z%}%- # ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "bir"
2:2 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "iki"
3:3 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "üç"
4:4 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dört"
5:5 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "beş"
6:6 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "altı"
7:7 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yedi"
8:8 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "sekiz"
9:9 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dokuz"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "on"
2%0:2%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yirmi"
3%0:3%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "otuz"
4%0:4%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "kırk"
5%0:5%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "elli"
6%0:6%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "altmış"
7%0:7%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yetmiş"
8%0:8%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "seksen"
9%0:9%0 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "doksan"

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG
%<prn%>%<neg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-IND
%<prn%>%<ind%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-COLL
%<prn%>%<coll%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM
%<prn%>%<dem%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON Common
allakim:allakim PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqayekda:allaqayekda PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqayerda:allaqayerda PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqayerdan:allaqayerdan PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqayga:allaqayga PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqayda:allaqayda PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqaydan:allaqaydan PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqayikdan:allaqayikdan PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqayirga:allaqayirga PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqaysi:allaqaysi PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqanaqa:allaqanaqa PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqanday:allaqanday PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqandoq:allaqandoq PRON-IND ; ! 
allaqancha:allaqancha PRON-IND ; ! 
allanarsa:allanarsa PRON-IND ; ! 
allanecha:allanecha PRON-IND ; ! 
allanechuq:allanechuq PRON-IND ; ! 
allanima:allanima PRON-IND ; ! 
anavi:anavi PRON-DEM ; ! 
anov:anov PRON-DEM ; ! 
anuv:anuv PRON-DEM ; ! 
baʼzi:baʼzi PRON-IND ; !  "sometimes"
baʼzibir:baʼzibir PRON-IND ; ! 
baʼzida:baʼzida PRON-IND ; ! 
bari:bari PRON-COLL ; ! 
barcha:barcha PRON-COLL ; ! 
beshinchi:beshinchi NUM ; ! 
beshov:beshov NUM ; ! 
beshovlab:beshovlab NUM ; ! 
beshovlon:beshovlon NUM ; ! 
beshta:beshta NUM ; ! 
billion:billion NUM ; ! "billion"
bir%-bir:bir%-bir PRON-IND ; ! ""
bir:bir NUM ; ! 
bir:bir NUM ; ! "one"
birinchi:birinchi NUM ; ! 
birov:birov NUM ; ! 
biron:biron PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "whichever"
bitta:bitta NUM ; ! 
bitta%-yarimta:bitta%-yarimta NUM ; ! 
yetmish:yetmish NUM ; ! "seventy"
yetti:yetti NUM ; ! "seven"
ikki:ikki NUM ; ! "two"
yigirma:yigirma NUM; ! "twenty"
kim:kim PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"
qaysi:qaysi PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "which one"
qanday:qanday PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "which one"
qancha:qancha PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "how many"
qirq:qirq NUM ; ! "forty"
milliard:milliard NUM ; ! "milliard"
million:million NUM ; ! "million"
ming:ming NUM ; ! "thousand"
nima:nima PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
oʻn:oʻn NUM ; ! "ten"
olti:olti NUM ; ! "six"
sakkiz:sakkiz NUM ; ! "eight"
toʻqqiz:toʻqqiz NUM ; ! "nine"
toʻrt:toʻrt NUM ; ! "four"
uch:uch NUM ; ! "three"
hech% kim:hech% kim PRON-NEG ; ! "nobody"
hech% qaysi:hech% qaysi PRON-NEG ; ! "neither"
hech% qanday:hech% qanday PRON-NEG ; ! "not any"
hech% qancha:hech% qancha PRON-NEG ; ! "not at all"
hech% qachon:hech% qachon PRON-NEG ; ! "never"
hech% qaerda:hech% qaerda PRON-NEG ; ! "nowhere"
hech% nima:hech% nima PRON-NEG ; ! "nothing"
yuz:yuz NUM ; ! "hundred"
LEXICON Proper
Beshiktosh:Beshiktosh  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
CNBC:CNBC  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Fenerbahche:Fenerbahche  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
IIV:IIV  NP-ORG ; ! "Ministry of Internal Affairs" ! El++
Kasimpasha:Kasimpasha  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Makfax:Makfax  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Nyu%-York% Daily% News:Nyu%-York% Daily% News  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Real% Sosedad:Real% Sosedad  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Vafo% SK:Vafo% SK  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Adanaspor:Adanaspor NP-ORG ; ! ""
Bild:Bild NP-ORG ; ! ""
EULEX:EULEX NP-ORG ; ! ""
HDZ:HDZ NP-ORG ; ! "Croatian Democratic Union"
Liverpool% FC:Liverpool% FC NP-ORG ; ! ""
PTT:PTT  NP-ORG ; ! ""
Sivasspor:Sivasspor NP-ORG ; ! ""
Valencia:Valencia NP-ORG ; ! ""
Angliya% futbol% ligasi:Angliya% futbol% ligasi  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Chili% Birinchi% ligasi:Chili% Birinchi% ligasi  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Ikkinchi% liga:Ikkinchi% liga  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Juma% Ligasi:Juma% Ligasi  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Ochkolar% ligasi:Ochkolar% ligasi  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Shotlandiya% Premer%-ligasi:Shotlandiya% Premer%-ligasi  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
UEFA% ayollar% chempionlar% ligasi:UEFA% ayollar% chempionlar% ligasi  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Yugoslaviya% ligasi:Yugoslaviya% ligasi  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
al:al NP-AL ; !
Antanta:Antanta NP-AL ; ! ""
bei:bei NP-AL ; !
Centre:Centre NP-AL ; ! ""
County:County NP-AL ; ! ""
Devoni% Lugʻatit% Turk:Devoni% Lugʻatit% Turk  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
FC:FC  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Futbol:Futbol  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
HIV:HIV NP-AL ; ! "" @?@
International:International NP-AL ; ! ""
KDV:KDV NP-AL ; ! ""
La:La NP-AL ; !
LHC:LHC  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Mishkatul% Mesabih:Mishkatul% Mesabih  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Muhakamatul% Lugʻatayn:Muhakamatul% Lugʻatayn  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Nevs:Nevs  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Nyu:Nyu NP-AL ; !
Oscar:Oscar  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
PA:PA  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Rav:Rav  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Saint:Saint NP-AL ; ! ""
Servet%-i% Funun:Servet%-i% Funun  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Super% G4:Super% G4  NP-AL ; ! "" ! El++
Tribune:Tribune NP-AL ; ! ""
Zabur:Zabur NP-AL ; !
Interfaks:Interfaks  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
Svoboda:Svoboda  NP-ORG ; ! "" ! El++
XS:XS NP-AL ; ! "Dress size"
XL:XL NP-AL ; ! "Dress size"
